Nebraska, session 109, LB1146.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1146 LB1146
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 79-209, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-209 (1) In all school districts in this state, any
superintendent, principal, teacher, or member of the school board who
knows of any violation of subsection (2) of section 79-201 shall within
three days report such violation to the attendance officer of the school,
who shall immediately investigate the case. When of his or her personal
knowledge or by report or complaint from any resident of the district,
the attendance officer believes that there is a violation of subsection
(2) of section 79-201, the attendance officer shall immediately
investigate such alleged violation.
(2) All school boards shall have a written policy on attendance
developed and annually reviewed in collaboration with the county attorney
of the county in which the principal office of the school district is
located. The policy shall include a provision indicating how the school
district will handle cases in which excessive absences are due to
illness. The policy shall also state the circumstances and number of
absences or the hourly equivalent upon which the school shall render all
services to address barriers to attendance. Such services shall be
provided upon twenty days of absence, and shall include, but not be
limited to:
(a) Written communication by school officials with the person or
persons who have legal or actual charge or control of any child; and
(b) One or more meetings between, at a minimum, a school attendance
officer, a school social worker, or a school administrator or his or her
designee, the person who has legal or actual charge or control of the
child, the person who is responsible for making educational decisions on
behalf of the child if that person is someone other than the person who
has legal or actual charge or control of the child, and the child, when
appropriate, to address the barriers to attendance. The result of the
meeting or meetings shall be to develop a collaborative plan to reduce
-2-

LB1146 LB1146
2026 2026
barriers identified to improve regular attendance. The plan shall
include, if agreed to by the person who is responsible for making
educational decisions on behalf of the child, an educational evaluation
to determine whether any intellectual, academic, physical, or social-
emotional barriers are contributing factors to the lack of attendance.
The plan shall also consider, but not be limited to:
(i) The physical, mental, or behavioral health of the child;
(ii) Educational counseling;
(iii) Referral to community agencies for economic services;
(iv) Family or individual counseling;
(v) Assisting the family in working with other community services;
and
(vi) Referral to restorative justice practices or services.
(3)(a) (3) The school may report to the county attorney of the
county in which the person resides when the school has documented the
efforts it has made as required by subsection (2) of this section that
the collaborative plan to reduce barriers identified to improve regular
attendance has not been successful and that the child has accrued twenty
days or more of unexcused absences during the school year. The following
shall not be considered unexcused absences:
(i) Absences excused by a parent, guardian, or educational
decisionmaker as defined in section 79-530 of the child for physical or
mental illness; or been absent more than twenty days per school year.
(ii) Absences:
(A) By pregnant or parenting students that are in accordance with a
policy developed pursuant to section 79-2,151; or
(B) By students (I) who have an individualized family service plan,
(II) who have an individualized education program under the federal
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.,
(III) receiving special accommodations or services under section 504 of
the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794, (IV) receiving
-3-

LB1146 LB1146
2026 2026
special education as defined in section 79-1125, or (V) who are eligible
for services under the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C.
1141 et seq., specifically the Education for Homeless Children and Youth
program, if such absences are related to any such plan, services, special
education, or program.
(b) The school shall notify the child's family in writing prior to
referring the child to the county attorney. Failure by the school to
document the efforts required by subsection (2) of this section is a
defense to prosecution under section 79-201 and to adjudication under
subdivision (3)(a) or (3)(b) of section 43-247 based upon such absences.
Illness that makes attendance impossible or impracticable shall not be
the basis for referral to the county attorney.
(4) Nothing in this section shall preclude a county attorney from
being involved at any stage in the process to address excessive
absenteeism.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-209, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-